Missouri, session 2026, HB3470.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 660, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 660.365, to read as follows:
660.365. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Charity Act".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Missouri partner network", a group of entities, including state departments
and agencies, public-private partnerships, and nonprofit, private-sector, and faith-based
organizations, which provides goods or services to directly support the participants'
goals and address identified barriers;
(2) "Participant", an individual who voluntarily participates in the charity
program;
(3) "Participating state agency", a state department, division, or agency that
takes part in the charity program at the direction of the governor.
3. (1) There shall be created within the department of social services the
"Charity" program. The office of the governor, in consultation with the department,
shall:
(a) Facilitate coordination and collaboration among participating state agencies
to implement the provisions of this section;
(b) Expand the Missouri partner network to meet the needs of participants;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3470 2
(c) Empower and assist participants in need to help identify and achieve
immediate, intermediate, and long-term goals and remove barriers to achievement of
personal goals;
(d) Use participating state agencies to serve families holistically in achieving self-
sufficiency, maximizing community integration, and building a prosperous future.
Barriers to self-sufficiency may include the inability to:
a. Obtain stable employment;
b. Increase wages;
c. Obtain the necessary skills for greater independence, education, or training;
d. Meet basic needs; and
e. Find stable housing; and
(e) Refer participants requiring assistance with employment or vocational
training to appropriate entities to prepare, train, and place the participants in
meaningful employment.
(2) (a) To participate in the charity program, an individual shall be:
a. A legal resident of this state;
b. A citizen of the United States or a permanent resident alien of the United
States, as determined by the U.S. Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services;
c. (i) At least eighteen years of age;
(ii) If emancipated, at least sixteen years of age; or
(iii) If under eighteen years of age and not emancipated, authorized to
participate by written consent of his or her parent or guardian.
(b) Participation in the charity program is voluntary.
(3) The department shall:
(a) Develop and maintain a website for individuals to connect with the charity
program; and
(b) Develop and maintain a charity program case management system that, at a
minimum, conducts intake for charity program inquiries and makes referrals for
individuals and families in need of services.
4. (1) The Missouri partner network shall work to build a network of
partnerships to sustain the effectiveness of the charity program.
(2) (a) State agencies shall participate in the charity program at the direction of
the governor.
(b) In order to use government resources more effectively and efficiently,
participating state agencies shall use existing resources and personnel, to the extent
possible, to operate the charity program.

HCS HB 3470 3
5. There is hereby established the "Task Force on the Protection of Children and
Families". The task force shall be composed of three members from the house of
representatives, three members from the senate, and three members appointed by the
governor. The senate members of the task force shall be appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate and the house members by the speaker of the house of
representatives. There shall be at least one member from the minority party of the
senate and at least one member from the minority party of the house of representatives.
The members appointed by the governor shall include one member from the children's
division, one member who is involved in family law, and one member who is a foster
parent.
6. The task force shall select a chairperson and a vice-chairperson, one of whom
shall be a member of the senate and one a member of the house of representatives. A
majority of the members shall constitute a quorum. The task force shall meet at least
once during each legislative session and at all other times as the chairperson may
designate.
7. The task force's purpose is to implement the provisions of the charity
program, safeguard children by providing rigorous oversight of prevention efforts, and
ensure accountability, transparency, and continuous improvement across all systems
responsible for protecting children from abuse.
8. The task force may make reasonable requests for staff assistance from the
research and appropriations staffs of the senate and house of representatives and the
joint committee on legislative research. In the performance of its duties, the task force
may request assistance or information from all branches of government and state
departments, agencies, boards, commissions, and offices.
9. The task force shall report to the general assembly and the governor no later
than December 30, 2027. The report shall include updates on the implementation of the
charity program and recommendations pertaining to:
(1) Child removal, including guidelines and timelines thereof;
(2) The protection or termination of parental rights;
(3) Proposed visitation progression policies;
(4) Guidelines for monthly reviews and case assessment;
(5) The rights of biological parents;
(6) The rights of foster parents; and
(7) Reporting requirements for child abuse and neglect.

HCS HB 3470 4
10. The task force shall be in effect for one year to assist in the implementation of
this section. The task force shall expire on December 31, 2027.
✔